Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2601
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-2601 to 77-2615:

(1) Person means and includes every individual, firm, association, joint-stock company, partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, corporation, trustee, or other legal entity, including any Indian tribe or instrumentality thereof;

(2) Wholesale dealer means a person who sells cigarettes to licensed retail dealers other than branch stores operated by or connected with such wholesale dealer for purposes of resale and is licensed under section 28-1423;

(3) Retail dealer includes every person other than a wholesale dealer engaged in the business of selling cigarettes in this state irrespective of quantity, amount, or number of sales thereof;

(4) Tax Commissioner means the Tax Commissioner of the State of Nebraska;

(5) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains (a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco; (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product, which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette; or (c) any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in subdivision (5)(a) of this section;

(6) Consumer means any person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint-stock company, syndicate, or corporation not having a license to sell cigarettes;

(7) Sales entity affiliate means an entity that (a) sells cigarettes that it acquires directly from a manufacturer or importer and (b) is affiliated with that manufacturer or importer. Entities are affiliated with each other if one directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by or is under common control with the other. Unless provided otherwise, manufacturer or importer includes any sales entity affiliate of that manufacturer or importer;

(8) Stamping agent has the same meaning as in section 69-2705; and

(9) Indian country means (a) all land in this state within the limits of any Indian reservation under the jurisdiction of the United States, notwithstanding the issuance of any patent, including rights-of-way running through the reservation, (b) all dependent Indian communities within the borders of this state, and (c) all Indian allotments in this state, the Indian titles to which have not been extinguished, including rights-of-way running through such allotments.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 1, p. 861;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 499;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 21.